hr-HR: Funkcija grijanog stakla: Antena ugrađena u staklo; Nema; Stražnja rešetka za odmrzavanje; Stražnja rešetka za odmrzavanje i antena ugrađena u staklo; Ostalo
tr: Isıtmalı cam özelliği: Cama gömülü anten; Yok; Arka buz çözücü ızgara; Arka buz çözücü ızgara + cama gömülü anten; Diğer
nl: Verwarmd glas kenmerk: In glas ingesloten antenne; Geen; Verwarmingsgrid achterruit; Verwarmingsgrid achter + in glas ingesloten antenne; Overig
es: Función de vidrio térmico: Antena incrustada en el vidrio; Ninguno; Rejilla de desempañador trasero; Rejilla de desempañador trasero + antena incrustada en el vidrio; Otro
en: Heated glass feature: Antenna embedded in glass; None; Rear defrost grid; Rear defrost grid + antenna embedded in glass; Other
ko: 열선 유리 기능: 유리 내장 안테나; 없음; 후면 성에 제거 그리드; 후면 성에 제거 그리드 + 유리 내장 안테나; 기타
bg-BG: Функция на отопляемото стъкло: Антена, вградена в стъклото; Няма; Реотани за задно стъкло; Реотани за задно стъкло + антена, вградена в стъклото; Други
vi: Tính năng kính có sưởi: Ăng-ten nhúng trong kính; Không có; Lưới sưởi kính sau; Lưới sưởi kính sau + ăng-ten nhúng trong kính; Khác
da: Opvarmet glasfunktion: Antenne integreret i glas; Ingen; Elbagrude-gitter; Elbagrude-gitter + antenne integreret i glas; Andet
it: Caratteristiche del vetro riscaldato: Antenna integrata nel vetro; Nessuna; Griglia di sbrinamento posteriore; Griglia di sbrinamento posteriore + antenna integrata nel vetro; Altro
fr: Fonction de vitrage chauffant: Antenne intégrée au verre; Aucun; Grille de dégivrage arrière; Grille de dégivrage arrière + antenne intégrée au verre; Autre
de: Funktion des beheizbaren Glases: Im Glas eingebettete Antenne; Keine; Heizgitter der Heckscheibe; Heckscheibenheizgitter + im Glas eingebettete Antenne; Sonstige
pl: Funkcja podgrzewania szyby: Antena wbudowana w szybę; Brak; Siatka ogrzewania tylnej szyby; Siatka ogrzewania tylnej szyby + antena wbudowana w szybę; Inna
zh-CN: 加热玻璃功能: 内置天线玻璃; 无; 后车窗除霜格栅; 后车窗除霜格栅 + 内置天线玻璃; 其他
hu: Fűtött üveg funkció: Üvegbe ágyazott antenna; Nincs; Hátsó fűtőszál; Hátsó fűtőszál és üvegbe ágyazott antenna; Egyéb
fi: Lämmitettävä lasi: Lasiin upotettu antenni; Ei mitään; Takalasin sulatusverkko; Takalasin sulatusverkko ja lasiin upotettu antenni; Muu
sv: Uppvärmt glas: Antenn inbäddad i glas; Ingen; Värmeslingor för bakruta; Värmeslingor för bakruta + antenn inbäddad i glas; Övrigt
pt-BR: Recurso de aquecimento de vidro: Antena embutida no vidro; Nenhum; Grade de desembaçador traseiro; Grade de desembaçador traseiro + antena embutida no vidro; Outro
ru: Особенности обогреваемого стекла: Антенна, встроенная в стекло; Нет; Сетка обогрева заднего стекла; Сетка обогрева заднего стекла + антенна, встроенная в стекло; Другое
ja: 加熱式ガラス機能: ガラス埋め込み式アンテナ; なし; リアデフロスターグリッド; リアデフロスターグリッド + ガラス埋め込み式アンテナ; その他
el: Λειτουργία θερμαινόμενου τζαμιού: Ενσωματωμένη κεραία στο τζάμι; Κανένα; Πλέγμα πίσω ξεπαγώματος; Πλέγμα πίσω ξεπαγώματος + κεραία ενσωματωμένη στο τζάμι; Άλλο
ro-RO: Funcție de sticlă încălzită: Antenă integrată în sticlă; Fără; Grilă de degivrare spate; Grilă de degivrare spate + antenă integrată în sticlă; Altele
th: คุณสมบัติกระจกทำความร้อน: เสาอากาศฝังในกระจก; ไม่มี; เส้นไล่ฝ้ากระจกหลัง; เส้นไล่ฝ้ากระจกหลัง + เสาอากาศฝังในกระจก; อื่นๆ
nb: Oppvarmet glassfunksjon: Antenne integrert i glasset; Ingen; Varmetråder i bakrute; Varmetråder i bakrute + antenne integrert i glasset; Annet
sl-SI: Funkcija ogrevanega stekla: V steklo vgrajena antena; Brez; Mreža za odmrzovanje zadnjega stekla; Mreža za odmrzovanje zadnjega stekla in antena, vgrajena v steklo; Drugo
cs: Funkce vyhřívaného skla: Anténa integrovaná ve skle; Žádná; Zadní odmrazovací mřížka; Zadní odmrazovací mřížka + anténa integrovaná ve skle; Jiné
zh-TW: 加熱玻璃功能特色: 玻璃內嵌天線; 無; 後除霜網; 後除霜網 + 玻璃內嵌天線; 其他
sk-SK: Funkcia vyhrievaného skla: Anténa integrovaná v skle; Žiadne; Zadná mriežka odmrazovania; Zadná mriežka odmrazovania + anténa integrovaná v skle; Iné
lt-LT: Šildomo stiklo funkcija: Stikle integruota antena; Nėra; Galinio stiklo atitirpinimo tinklelis; Galinio stiklo atitirpinimo tinklelis + stikle integruota antena; Kita
pt-PT: Recurso de vidro aquecido: Antena incorporada no vidro; Nenhum; Grelha de desembaciamento traseira; Grelha de desembaciamento traseira + antena incorporada no vidro; Outra